Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 16 Plant Disease and Pest Control
2-16-410. Misbranded pesticides.

A pesticide is misbranded:

If its labeling bears any statement, design, or graphic representation relative to the pesticide or to its ingredients which is false or misleading in any particular;

If it is an imitation of or is distributed under the name of another pesticide;

If any word, statement, or other information required to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness, compared with other words, statements, designs, or graphic matter in the labeling, and in such terms, as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use;

If the labeling does not contain a statement of the federal use classification under which the product is registered;

If the labeling accompanying it does not contain directions for use which are necessary for effecting the purpose for which the product is intended, and the directions if complied with, together with any requirements imposed under Section 3(3) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136a, are adequate to protect health and the environment;

If the label does not bear:

The name, brand, or trademark under which the pesticide is distributed;

An ingredient statement on that part of the immediate container and on the outside container and wrapper of the retail package, if there is one, through which the ingredient statement on the immediate container cannot be clearly read, which is presented or displayed under customary conditions of purchase. The ingredient statement may appear prominently on another part of the container as permitted under Section 2(q)(2)(A) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136(q)(2)(A), if the size or form of the container makes it impracticable to place it on the part of the retail package which is presented or displayed under customary conditions of purchase;

A warning or caution statement which may be necessary and which, if complied with together with any requirements imposed under section 3(d) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136a(d), would be adequate to protect the health and environment;

The net weight or measure of the content;

The name and address of the manufacturer, registrant, or person for whom manufactured; and

The United States Environmental Protection Agency registration number assigned to each establishment in which it was produced and the United States Environmental Protection Agency registration number assigned to the pesticide, if required by regulations under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136 et seq.;

If that pesticide contains any substance in quantities highly toxic to man unless the label bears, in addition to other label requirements:

The skull and crossbones;

The word “POISON” in red prominently displayed on a background of distinctly contrasting color; and

A statement of a practical treatment, first aid or otherwise, to be used in case of poisoning by the pesticide;

If the pesticide container does not bear a registered label; and

If a spray adjuvant label fails to state the type or function of the functioning agents.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-231.

2-16-411. Unlawful actions — Exceptions.

It is unlawful for any person to distribute in this state any of the following:

Any pesticide which has not been registered under:

The provisions of this subchapter; or

The provisions of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136 et seq.;

Any pesticide if any of the claims made for it or any of the directions for its use or other labeling differs from the representations made in connection with its registration, or if the composition of a pesticide differs from its composition as represented in connection with its registration. A change in the labeling or formulation of a pesticide may be made within a registration period without requiring reregistration of the product if the registration is amended to reflect the change and if the change will not violate any provision of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act or this subchapter;

Any pesticide unless it is in the registrant's or the manufacturer's unbroken immediate container and there is affixed to the container, and to the outside container or wrapper of the retail package if there is one through which the required information on the immediate container cannot be clearly read, a label bearing the information required in this subchapter and the regulations adopted under this subchapter. The State Plant Board may designate that certain specified economic poisons may be sold by the manufacturers or dealers in bulk, in which case the label information required and any other statements required by this subchapter must be stated in or attached to the invoice. In addition, a copy of the invoice must be given to the purchaser at the time the economic poison is delivered;

Any pesticide which has not been colored or discolored under the provisions of § 2-16-406(a)(4) or of Section 25(c)(5) of the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136w(c)(5);

Any pesticide which is adulterated or misbranded or any device which is misbranded; and

Any pesticide in containers which are unsafe due to damage.

However, this subsection shall not apply to:

Any carrier while lawfully engaged in transporting a pesticide within this state if the carrier shall, upon request, permit the board to copy all records showing the transactions in and movement of the pesticides or devices;

Public officials of this state and the federal government while engaged in the performance of their official duties in administering state or federal pesticide laws or regulations or while engaged in pesticide research;

The manufacturer or shipper of a pesticide for experimental use only by or under the supervision of an agency of this state or of the federal government authorized by law to conduct research in the field of pesticides if the manufacturer or shipper holds a valid experimental-use permit as provided for by § 2-16-409 or by the United States Environmental Protection Agency; or

Any person who ships a substance or mixture of substances being put through tests, in which the purpose is only to determine its value for pesticide purposes or to determine its toxicity or other properties, from which the user does not expect to receive any benefit in pest control from its use.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Detach, alter, deface, or destroy, wholly or in part, any label or labeling provided for in this subchapter or in regulations adopted under this subchapter or to add any substance to or take any substance from a pesticide in a manner that may defeat the purpose of this subchapter or the regulations adopted hereunder;

Use for his or her own advantage or to reveal, other than to the board, to properly designated state or federal officials, to employees of the state or federal executive agencies, to the courts of the state in response to a subpoena, to physicians, or in emergencies to pharmacists and other qualified persons for use in the preparation of antidotes, any information relative to formulas of products acquired by authority of § 2-16-407 or any information judged by the board as containing or relating to trade secrets or commercial or financial information obtained by authority of this subchapter and marked as privileged or confidential by the registrant;

Handle, transport, store, display, or distribute pesticides in such a manner as to endanger man and his or her environment or to endanger food, feed, or any other products that may be transported, stored, displayed, or distributed with the pesticides;

Dispose of, discard, or store any pesticides or pesticide containers in such a manner as to cause injury to humans, vegetation, crops, livestock, wildlife, or beneficial insects or to pollute any water supply or waterway; or

Refuse or otherwise fail to comply with the provisions of this subchapter, the regulations adopted hereunder, or any lawful order of the board.

No person shall transport, store, or dispose of any pesticide or pesticide containers in such a manner as to cause injury to humans, vegetation, crops, livestock, wildlife, or beneficial insects or to pollute any waterway in a way harmful to any wildlife therein. The board may promulgate rules and regulations governing the storing and disposal of pesticides or pesticide containers. In determining these standards, the board shall take into consideration any regulations issued by the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

No pesticide or device shall be deemed in violation of this subchapter when intended solely for export to a foreign country, and when prepared or packed according to the specification or directions of the purchaser. If not so exported, all the provisions of this subchapter shall apply.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed as requiring the board to report minor violations of this subchapter for prosecution or for the institution of condemnation proceedings when it believes that the public interest will be served best by a suitable notice of warning in writing.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, §§ 10, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 77-236, 77-237.

2-16-412. Enforcement.

(1)The sampling and examination of pesticides or devices shall be made by the State Plant Board for the purpose of determining whether they comply with the requirements of this subchapter.

The board is authorized to enter any distributor's premises, including any vehicle of transport, at all reasonable times in order to have access to pesticides or devices packaged or labeled for distribution and to collect samples of the contents, containers, or labeling for the pesticides or devices.

If an analysis is made of the samples, a copy of the results of the analysis shall be furnished promptly to the owner, operator, or agent in charge.

If it appears from the examination that a pesticide or device fails to comply with the provisions of this subchapter or rules adopted hereunder and the board contemplates instituting criminal proceedings against any person, the board shall cause appropriate notice to be given to that person.

Any person so notified shall be given an opportunity within a reasonable time to present his or her views, either orally or in writing, with regard to the contemplated proceedings.

If thereafter, in the opinion of the board, it appears that the provisions of this subchapter or rules adopted hereunder have been violated by the person, the board shall refer a copy of the results of the analysis or the examination of the pesticide or device to the prosecuting attorney for the county in which the violation occurred.

(1)For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this subchapter, the board may enter upon any public or private premises at reasonable times in order to inspect storage or disposal areas or sample pesticides being applied or to be applied.

Should the board be denied access to any premises or other areas where access was sought for the purposes set forth in this subchapter, it may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to those premises or other areas for the purposes set forth in this subchapter. The court may, upon such application, issue the search warrant for the purposes requested.

The board, with or without the aid and advice of the prosecuting attorney, is charged with the duty of enforcing the requirements of this subchapter and any rules issued thereunder. In the event a prosecuting attorney refuses to act on behalf of the board, the Attorney General may so act.

The board is authorized to apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for, and the court upon hearing and for cause shown may grant, a temporary or permanent injunction. This injunction shall restrain any person from violating any provisions of this subchapter or of the rules made under authority of this subchapter and shall be without bond.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-238.

2-16-413. Issuance of stop-sale, etc., order.

When the State Plant Board has reasonable cause to believe a pesticide or device is being distributed, stored, transported, or used in violation of any of the provisions of this subchapter, or of any of the rules prescribed under the authority of this subchapter, it may issue and serve a written stop-sale, use, or removal order upon the owner or custodian of the pesticide or device.

If the owner or custodian is not available for service of the order upon him or her, the board may attach the order or other suitable marking to the pesticide or device and notify the owner or custodian and the registrant.

The pesticide or device shall not be sold, used, or removed until the provisions of this subchapter have been complied with and until the pesticide or device has been released in writing under conditions specified by the board or the violation has been otherwise disposed of as provided in this subchapter by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-239.

2-16-414. Hearing on stop-sale, etc., order.

(1)After service of a stop-sale, use, or removal order is made upon any person, either that person, the registrant, or the State Plant Board may file an action in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county in which a violation of this subchapter or rules adopted hereunder is alleged to have occurred for an adjudication of the alleged violation.

The court in the action may issue temporary or permanent injunctions, mandatory or restraining orders, and such intermediate orders as it deems necessary or advisable.

The court may order condemnation of any pesticide or device which does not meet the requirements of this subchapter or rules adopted hereunder.

(1)If the pesticide or device is condemned, it shall, after entry of decree, be disposed of by destruction or sale as the court directs.

If the pesticide or device is sold, the proceeds, less costs including legal costs, shall be paid to the State Treasury as provided in §2-16-419.

The pesticide or device shall not be sold contrary to the provisions of this subchapter or rules adopted hereunder.

Upon payment of costs and execution and delivery of a good and sufficient bond conditioned that the pesticide or device shall not be disposed of unlawfully, the court may direct that the pesticide or device be delivered to its owner for relabeling, reprocessing, removing from the state, or otherwise bringing the product into compliance.

When a decree of condemnation is entered against the pesticide or device, court costs, fees, storage, and other proper expenses shall be awarded against the person, if any, appearing as claimant of the pesticide.

No state court shall allow the recovery of damages from administrative action taken or for stop-sale, use, or removal if the court finds that there was probable cause for such action.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, §§ 14, 18; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 77-240, 77-244.

2-16-415. Subpoenas.

The State Plant Board may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or production of books, documents, and records in the state in any hearing affecting the authority or privilege granted by a registration issued under the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-243.

2-16-416. Intergovernmental cooperation.

The State Plant Board may cooperate, receive grants-in-aid, and enter into cooperative agreements or contracts with any agency of the federal government or this state or its subdivisions or with any agency of another state, in order to:

Secure uniformity of rules;

Enter into cooperative agreements with the United States Environmental Protection Agency to register pesticides under the authority of this subchapter and the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C. §136 et seq.; and

Cooperate in the enforcement of the federal pesticide control laws through the use of state or federal personnel and facilities and implement cooperative enforcement programs, including, but not limited to, the registration and inspection of establishments.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-241.

2-16-417. Publication of information.

The State Plant Board may publish, in such form as it may deem proper, results of analyses based on official samples as compared with the analyses guaranteed and information concerning the distribution of pesticides.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-242.

2-16-418. Protection of trade secrets and other information.

In submitting data required by this subchapter, the applicant may:

Clearly mark any portions thereof which in his or her opinion are trade secrets or commercial or financial information; and

Submit such marked material separately from other material required to be submitted under this subchapter.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the State Plant Board shall not make public any information which, in its judgment, contains or relates to trade secrets or commercial or financial information obtained from a person and is privileged or confidential, except that, when necessary to carry out the provisions of this subchapter, information relating to formulas of products acquired by authorization of this subchapter may be revealed to any state or federal agency consulted or in findings of fact issued by the board.

If the board proposes to release for inspection information which the applicant or registrant believes to be protected from disclosure under subsection (b) of this section, it shall notify the applicant or registrant, in writing, by certified mail.

The board shall not, after mailing the notice as provided in this subsection, make available for inspection the data until thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice by the applicant or registrant.

During this period, the applicant or registrant may institute an action in an appropriate court for a declaratory judgment as to whether the information is subject to protection under subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-245.

2-16-419. Disposition of funds.

All moneys received by the State Plant Board under the provisions of this subchapter and the rules adopted hereunder shall be deposited into the State Plant Board Fund of the State Treasury and be used for carrying out the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 410, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-247.

Subchapter 5

— Johnson Grass Control and Eradication

Effective Dates. Acts 1967, No. 186, § 14: Feb. 28, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that many counties in this state are plagued with an acute and rapidly progressing Johnson Grass problem; that the land upon which such grass grows decreases in value and fails to produce an adequate yield of crops, thereby affecting the economy of this state; that there is no existing program to combat this problem in these counties; and that in order to control and eradicate Johnson Grass and to insure record yields of crops on all lands in this state, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 287, § 12: Mar. 3, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Johnson Grass Control and Eradication Law of this state is in urgent need of clarification and modification to enable the various areas of the state to take advantage of its provisions to alleviate the problem of Johnson Grass in the state, and that this act is designed to so clarify and modify said laws and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Cross References. State Plant Board Operations and Facilities Construction Fund, §2-16-108.

2-16-501. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Johnson Grass Control and Eradication Act”.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 1; 1975, No. 287, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1701.

2-16-502. Applicability.

The provisions of this subchapter shall be applicable to and shall be enforced only in those areas of this state established as Johnson grass control and eradication districts in the manner authorized herein. For the purposes of this subchapter, a district may consist of one (1) or more contiguous townships in one (1) or more contiguous counties, but in no event shall a single district lie in more than three (3) counties.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 2; 1975, No. 287, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1702.

2-16-503. Penalty.

Any landowner or any person having control of any land in a Johnson grass control and eradication district who fails or refuses to control or eradicate Johnson grass on his or her lands shall be guilty of a violation.

Upon conviction, an offender shall be subject to a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation.

Each day a violation shall exist or continue shall constitute a separate offense.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (a).

Amendments. The 2005 amendment redesignated former (b) as present (b)(1)(A) and (B); substituted “thirty (30)” for “forty-five (45)” in (b)(1)(A); and added (b)(2).

The 2007 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2009 amendment substituted “§7-11-201 et seq.” for “§7-5-103(b)” twice in (b)(1).

If in any special election a majority of the landowners voting on the question shall vote against the establishment of the district, the question shall not again be submitted to the landowners of the district for one (1) year.

If at the special election the majority of the landowners voting on the question shall vote for the establishment of the district, then the vote shall be entered on the record, and the county clerk or clerks shall notify the judge or judges who shall declare the designated area to be a Johnson grass control and eradication district and shall cause notice to be published in a newspaper having a general circulation in the electing district.

The notice shall state that the district has been established, that the provisions of this subchapter shall be applicable in the district, and that all landowners in the district shall take steps to control and eradicate Johnson grass on all lands owned by them or under their control, in accordance with this subchapter.

Within ten (10) days after the publication of the notice, the county judge or judges in which a district lies shall appoint a district Johnson grass control board composed of three (3) landowners in the district to advise and assist in the administration of this subchapter in that district.

If the district is in a single county, the county judge of that county shall appoint the three (3) members of the board.

If a district lies within two (2) counties, the county judge in which the greater acreage of the district lies shall appoint two (2) members of the board, and the county judge of the other county in which a portion of the district lies shall appoint one (1) member.

In the event a district lies within three (3) counties, the county judge of each county in which a portion of the district lies shall appoint one (1) member to the board.

The district Johnson grass control board shall select and employ a district Johnson grass control and eradication supervisor, who shall be a resident of the district and who shall have a thorough knowledge of ways and means of controlling and eradicating Johnson grass.

The supervisor, through the direction of the board, shall be charged with the administration and enforcement of this subchapter in the district.

The supervisor shall be a full-time employee of the district and shall receive such salary and other compensation and expenses as shall be determined by the board.

The county court in each county in which a portion of a district lies shall provide from the county general fund, on a basis proportional to the amount of district acreage in the county to the total acreage in the district, such funds as shall be sufficient to pay the salary of the supervisor and to otherwise carry out the purposes of this subchapter in the district.

The district Johnson grass control and eradication supervisor of each district shall have and exercise the following powers and duties, among others, regarding the Johnson grass eradication program:

The supervisor shall periodically inspect all lands in the district. Annually and at such other times as may be required by the district board the supervisor shall make a complete report to the district board and the director of the progress being made in the district in the control and eradication of Johnson grass.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 8; 1975, No. 287, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1708; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 9.

2-16-504. Petition to establish district.

(1)Upon the petition of fifty (50) landowners filed with the county court or courts in which a proposed district lies, the county court or courts shall declare that a threat to the agricultural economy of the proposed district exists by reason of the uncontrolled growth of Johnson grass.

The county court or courts shall cause the question of whether the district shall be established and this subchapter shall be enforced in the district to be submitted to the landowners of the proposed district.

(1)Immediately upon the submission of the petition to the county court or courts, the court or courts shall issue a proclamation calling the election in accordance with §7-11-201 et seq. and notify the county board or boards of election commissioners in writing. The election shall be held on a date in accordance with §7-11-201 et seq. but in no event more than ninety (90) days following publication of the proclamation.

This special election shall be held for the purpose of submitting to the landowners of the proposed district the question of whether the district shall be established and the provisions of this subchapter shall be enforced in the district.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 3; 1975, No. 287, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1703; Acts 2005, No. 2145, § 1; 2007, No. 1049, § 1; 2009, No. 1480, § 1.

2-16-505. Establishment of district.

When the question as to whether this subchapter shall be enforced in any district is submitted to the landowners of the district at any special election called for that purpose, the question shall be submitted to the landowners in substantially the following form on the ballot:

FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A JOHNSON GRASS CONTROL AND ERADICATION DISTRICT COMPOSED OF
AGAINST THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A JOHNSON GRASS CONTROL AND ERADICATION DISTRICT COMPOSED OF

Click to view form.

(1)Only qualified electors of the proposed district who are owners of real property in the proposed district shall be permitted to vote in the election.

Every person voting in the election shall be required to sign an affidavit that the person is an owner of real property in the proposed district.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 4; 1975, No. 287, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1704.

2-16-506. Powers and duties of district supervisors.

To supervise the eradication of Johnson grass;

To inspect property in the district to determine whether this subchapter is being complied with by those owning or having control of such lands;

To inform himself or herself of the nature of Johnson grass and to follow the recommendations of the Director of the State Plant Board and the College of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas as to the best methods of controlling, eradicating, and preventing the dissemination of Johnson grass; and

Through the director, to enter into agreements with the state and federal agencies for the cooperative control of Johnson grass.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 6; 1975, No. 287, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1706.

2-16-507. State assistance.

The Director of the State Plant Board is authorized to cooperate with and assist the district Johnson grass control board and the supervisor in the control and eradication of Johnson grass in the district when requested to do so by the board or the supervisor.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 7; 1975, No. 287, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1707.

2-16-508. Civil remedies.

Notwithstanding the criminal penalty for the violation of this subchapter, the existence or growth of Johnson grass in a Johnson grass control and eradication district is declared to be a public and common nuisance, and it is the duty of the prosecuting attorney in whose district the offense occurs to bring an action to enjoin the nuisance.

Any landowner whose land is adjacent to or within one hundred feet (100') of land on which the Johnson grass nuisance is permitted or maintained may bring a civil action for injunction against any person permitting or maintaining the nuisance and shall, in addition to injunctive relief, be entitled to recover double the actual damages sustained as a result of the nuisance as well as a reasonable attorney's fee and cost of bringing the action.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 10; 1975, No. 287, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1710.

2-16-509. Duties of landowners.

It shall be the duty of the State of Arkansas or any department thereof, any public utility, railroad, levee and drainage district, county, or any municipality, and every other person, firm, corporation, or association owning or having control over any lands in a Johnson grass control and eradication district to:

Control and eradicate Johnson grass on all lands, rights-of-way, and easements owned, occupied, or controlled by them;

Employ methods approved by the Director of the State Plant Board for control and eradication of Johnson grass as the district board shall direct; and

Comply with all orders and rules of the district board and the director.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 5; 1975, No. 287, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1705.

2-16-510. Acceptance of gifts, etc.

The district Johnson grass control board is authorized to accept gifts, grants, and donations for use in carrying out the purpose of controlling and eradicating Johnson grass in the district.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 9; 1975, No. 287, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1709.

2-16-511. Abolition of district.

Any district established under the provisions of this subchapter may be abolished upon a majority vote of the landowners of the district at a special election called for that purpose.

The question of abolishing a district shall be submitted to the landowners of the district in the same manner as is provided in § 2-16-502.

Effective Dates. Acts 1991, No. 710, § 22: Mar. 22, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the boll weevil is not only a pest but that it threatens the growth of cotton in this state and costs many thousands of dollars in damages annually; that the purpose of this act is to establish a program to control the boll weevil and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary to the public peace, health and welfare shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 529, § 8: Mar. 6, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas boll weevil suppression program has been and continues to be a valuable tool in controlling the boll weevil population in the state; that the boll weevil suppression program law is in need of minor revisions to promote and strengthen the program; that such revisions are urgently needed to assure the continued success of the program and that this act is designed to effect those revisions and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 317, § 8: Mar. 3, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 10 of the First Extraordinary Session of 1995 abolished the Joint Interim Committee on Agriculture and Economic Development and in its place established separate House and Senate Committees; that various sections of the Arkansas Code refer to the Joint Interim Committee on Agriculture and Economic Development and should be corrected to refer to the House and Senate Interim Committees; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to make the laws compatible as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1726, § 3: Apr. 22, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the representation on the board of directors of the certified crop growers' organization should be proportional to the acreage of cotton within each eradication zone; that this act so provides; and that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to provide appropriate representation of the cotton growers within each zone. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 1967, No. 186, § 11; 1975, No. 287, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 77-1711.

Subchapter 6

— Arkansas Boll Weevil Suppression Eradication Act

2-16-601. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Arkansas Boll Weevil Suppression Eradication Act”.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 710, § 1.

2-16-602. Declaration of policy — Purpose — Construction.

The General Assembly has found and determined and does hereby declare that the boll weevil is a public nuisance, a pest, and a menace to the cotton industry. Due to the interstate nature of the boll weevil infestation, it is necessary to secure the cooperation of cotton growers and other state and federal governments to carry out a program of boll weevil suppression or eradication.

The purpose of this subchapter is to secure the suppression or eradication of the boll weevil and to provide for certification of a cotton growers' organization to cooperate with state and federal agencies in the administration of any available cost-sharing programs for the suppression or eradication of the boll weevil.

This subchapter should be liberally construed to achieve the purposes provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 710, § 2; 1997, No. 330, § 1.

2-16-603. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Assessment” means the amount charged to each cotton grower to finance, in whole or part, a program to suppress or eradicate the boll weevil in this state.

The grower's charge will be calculated on a per-acre basis;

“Boll weevil” means Anthonomus grandis Boheman in any state of development;

“Certificate” means a document issued or authorized by the State Plant Board indicating that a regulated article is not contaminated with boll weevils;

“Cotton” means any cotton plant or cotton plant product upon which the boll weevil is dependent for completion of any portion of its life cycle;

“Cotton grower” means any person, other than a cash rent landlord, who is engaged in or has an economic risk in the business of producing, or causing cotton to be produced, for market;

“Host” means any plant or plant product upon which the boll weevil is dependent for completion of any portion of its life cycle;

“Infested” means actually infested with a boll weevil or so exposed to infestation that it would be reasonable to believe that an infestation exists;

“Permit” means a document issued or authorized by the board to provide for the movement of regulated articles to restricted designations for limited handling, utilization, or processing;

“Person” means any individual, partnership, corporation, company, society, or association, or other business entity;

“Regulated article” means any article of any character carrying or capable of carrying the boll weevil, including, but not limited to, cotton plants, seed cotton, cottonseed, other hosts, gin trash, gin equipment, mechanical cotton pickers, and other equipment associated with cotton production, harvesting, or processing; and

“State Plant Board” means the agricultural plant regulatory agency of the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 710, § 3; 1997, No. 330, § 2.

2-16-604. Criminal penalties.

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this subchapter or the rules promulgated hereunder, or who shall alter, forge, or counterfeit, or use without authority any certificate or permit or other document provided for in this subchapter or in the rules promulgated hereunder, shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

Any person who shall, except in compliance with the rules of the State Plant Board, move any regulated article into this state from any other state which the board found in the rules is infested by the boll weevil shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 710, § 11.